Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.113

When director appoints majority of the commission—Nominations—Advisory vote—Notice—Director selects either of two candidates receiving the most votes.

(1) This section applies when the director appoints a majority of the positions of the commission as set forth under RCW 15.66.110(3).

(2) Candidates for director-appointed positions on a commission shall be nominated under RCW 15.66.120(1).

(3) Not less than sixty days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a commission member's term, the director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the director-appointed positions. Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all affected producers and shall be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment to the commission. In the event there are only two candidates nominated for a position, an advisory vote may not be held and the candidates' names shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment.

(4) The candidates whose names are forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall submit to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to the commission. The director may select either person for the position.

[ 2011 c 103 s 21; 2002 c 313 s 52.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.